Washington statutes.
RCW 19.270.070

Intent—Chapter preempts local laws.

It is the intent of the legislature that this chapter is a matter of statewide concern. This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, and other laws adopted by a city, county, city and county, municipality, or local agency regarding spyware and notices to consumers from computer software providers regarding information collection.

[ 2005 c 500 s 7.]